Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2438
Immunosuppressant drug repository program; established.

The department shall establish an immunosuppressant drug repository program for accepting donated immunosuppressant drugs and dispensing such drugs. Participation in the program shall be voluntary.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 44.